Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-702
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetist Practice Act and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-703 to 38-706 apply.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 232.